Maryland, session 2025, SB0077.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
1–1321.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0077*

SENATE BILL 77
(A) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY, INCLUDING A UNIT OF A COUNTY OR
MUNICIPALITY, MAY NOT USE PUBLIC FUNDS TO PROVIDE FUNDING FOR OR
PAYMENT TO THE CONSTITUTIONAL SHERIFFS AND PEACE OFFICERS
ASSOCIATION, INCLUDING FUNDING OR PAYMENT FOR MEMBERSHIP DUES,
TRAININGS, CERTIFICATIONS, OR CONFERENCES.
(B) AN ORGANIZATION THAT RECEIVES PUBLIC FUNDS FROM A COUNTY OR
MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT USE THOSE FUNDS TO PROVIDE FUNDING FOR OR PAYMENT
TO THE CONSTITUTIONAL SHERIFFS AND PEACE OFFICERS ASSOCIATION,
INCLUDING FUNDING OR PAYMENT FOR MEMBERSHIP DUES, TRAININGS,
CERTIFICATIONS, OR CONFERENCES.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
7–240.
(A) AN OFFICER OR A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT MAY NOT USE ANY PART
OF AN APPROPRIATION TO PROVIDE FUNDING FOR OR PAYMENT TO THE
CONSTITUTIONAL SHERIFFS AND PEACE OFFICERS ASSOCIATION, INCLUDING
FUNDING OR PAYMENT FOR MEMBERSHIP DUES, TRAININGS, CERTIFICATIONS, OR
CONFERENCES.
(B) AN ORGANIZATION THAT RECEIVES FUNDS APPROPRIATED BY THE
STATE MAY NOT USE THOSE FUNDS TO PROVIDE FUNDING FOR OR PAYMENT TO THE
CONSTITUTIONAL SHERIFFS AND PEACE OFFICERS ASSOCIATION, INCLUDING
FUNDING OR PAYMENT FOR MEMBERSHIP DUES, TRAININGS, CERTIFICATIONS, OR
CONFERENCES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.